Hawaii statutes.
§171-18.5 Sugarcane lands conveyed
for the development of housing projects. (a) This section applies to the
amount to which the department of Hawaiian home lands is entitled pursuant to
article XII, section 1 of the state constitution, from land as designated in
subsection (e) previously cultivated as sugarcane land under any provision of
law that is conveyed by the department to the Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation for the development of housing projects as defined
under section 201H-1. The amount to which the department of Hawaiian home
lands is entitled shall be determined by multiplying the fair market value of
the land by thirty per cent. For the purpose of this section:

"Fair market value" means the amount
of money that a purchaser willing but not obliged to buy the land would pay to
an owner willing but not obliged to sell it, taking into consideration the
highest and best use of the land.

"Highest and best use" means the most
profitable, probable, and legal use to which the land can be put.

(b) Fair market value shall be determined on a
per acre basis pursuant to appraisals performed in conformance with the uniform
standards of professional appraisal practice as adopted by the department of
commerce and consumer affairs, not more than ninety days before the conveyance
of the land to the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation. The
appraisals shall be performed by two disinterested appraisers each of whose
services shall be contracted by the department and the department of Hawaiian
home lands, respectively. If the land is sugarcane lands and of the public
land trust, as defined in section 10-2, the department of Hawaiian home lands
and the office of Hawaiian affairs shall contract the services of one
appraiser. The parties shall contract the services of the two appraisers
within thirty days after the department gives written notice to the department
of Hawaiian home lands, together with the office of Hawaiian affairs if the
land is sugarcane lands and of the public land trust, of the proposed
conveyance of the land to the Hawaii housing finance and development
corporation.

If any party fails or refuses to contract the
services of an appraiser, then the other party may petition the circuit court
in the county where the land is located to appoint the other of the two
appraisers. If the two appraisers are unable to agree on a fair market value,
then within thirty days thereafter, the department and the department of
Hawaiian home lands, together with the office of Hawaiian affairs if the land
is sugarcane lands and of the public land trust, shall contract for the
services of a mutually agreed upon third appraiser and the decision of the
majority of the appraisers shall be final with respect to determination of the
fair market value of the land. If the department and the department of
Hawaiian home lands, together with the office of Hawaiian affairs if the land
is sugarcane lands and of the public land trust, are unable to agree on the
selection of the third appraiser, any party may petition the circuit court in
the county where the land is located to appoint the third appraiser.

(c) The amount due to the department of
Hawaiian home lands shall be due and payable by the State on the date of
conveyance of the land to the Hawaii housing finance and development
corporation. Payment to the department of Hawaiian home lands may be in the
form of public lands or moneys. If payment is to be made in the form of public
lands, the lands shall be mutually agreed upon by the department of land and
natural resources and the department of Hawaiian home lands, and shall be of
value comparable to the amount due to the department of Hawaiian home lands.
Any monetary payment shall be an obligation of the Hawaii housing finance and development
corporation. Any portion of that amount that is not paid on the date of
conveyance shall be subject to simple interest annually, established pursuant
to the fifteen year treasury rate at the time of the conveyance and payable
annually by the State to the department of Hawaiian home lands.

(d) Thirty per cent of the revenue received by
the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation from commercial,
industrial, or other nonresidential use of the land shall be paid annually to
the department of Hawaiian home lands; provided that:

(1) The department of Hawaiian home lands shall not
receive payment under this subsection until the Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation recovers all moneys previously paid to the department
of Hawaiian home lands for that portion of land used for commercial,
industrial, or other nonresidential purposes;

(2) If borrowed moneys are used to finance the
development of land for commercial, industrial, or other nonresidential
purposes, annual payments due to the department of Hawaiian home lands under
this subsection shall be made pursuant to the following order of priority:

(A) The Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation satisfies as a first priority the amount computed
annually on the pro rata portion (not the total debt service over the life of
the debt) of its total debt service on the borrowed moneys;

(B) The Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation satisfies as a second priority its operating expense
obligations directly incurred from the development and operating of land used
for commercial, industrial, or other nonresidential purposes in an amount not
exceeding one per cent of revenues; and

(C) After the first and second priorities are
satisfied, the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation shall make
annual payments due to the department of Hawaiian home lands under this
subsection from any remaining revenues; and

(3) In the event of a sale of land used for
commercial, industrial, or other nonresidential purposes, the department of
Hawaiian home lands shall receive thirty per cent of the revenue received by
the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation.

(e) This section shall only apply to the
Hawaii housing finance and development corporation's developments known as the
villages of Leali‘i, Maui, and villages of La‘i‘opua, Hawaii. [L 1992, c 317,
§1; am L 1997, c 350, §§14, 15; am L 2005, c 196, §26(b); am L 2006, c 180, §16;
am L 2007, c 249, §12]

Note

The amendment made by
L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in this section.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next